Wisconsin, session 2025, SB784.
do enact as follows:SB784,11Section 1. 66.0511 (1) (c) of the statutes is created to read:SB784,2,5266.0511 (1) (c) “State agency” means an association, authority, board, 3department, commission, independent agency, institution, office, society, or other 4body in state government created or authorized to be created by the constitution or 5any law, including the legislature and the courts.SB784,26Section 2. 66.0511 (1) (d) of the statutes is created to read:SB784,2,11766.0511 (1) (d) “Warrior-style training” means training for law enforcement 8officers that dehumanizes people or encourages aggressive conduct by law 9enforcement officers during encounters with others in a manner that de-10emphasizes the value of human life or constitutional rights, the result of which 11increases an officer’s likelihood or willingness to use deadly force.SB784,312Section 3. 66.0511 (5) of the statutes is created to read:SB784,2,141366.0511 (5) Warrior-style training. (a) A law enforcement agency may not 14provide or arrange for warrior-style training of law enforcement officers.SB784,2,1815(b) A law enforcement agency or the law enforcement standards board or any 16other state agency may not reimburse a law enforcement officer or a collective 17bargaining unit that includes law enforcement officers for any expenditures made 18to provide or arrange for warrior-style training of law enforcement officers.SB784,2,2219(c) Notwithstanding s. 66.0901 (1m), a law enforcement agency or the law 20enforcement standards board or any other state agency may not contract for 21services with an organization that provides warrior-style training of law 22enforcement officers.SB784,3,11(d) This subsection does not prohibit any of the following:SB784,3,321. A law enforcement agency from providing or arranging for training of law 3enforcement officers in aikido.SB784,3,642. A law enforcement agency or a state agency from reimbursing a law 5enforcement officer or a collective bargaining unit for training law enforcement 6officers in aikido.SB784,47Section 4. 165.85 (2) (h) of the statutes is created to read:SB784,3,98165.85 (2) (h) “Warrior-style training” has the meaning given in s. 66.0511 (1) 9(d).SB784,510Section 5. 165.85 (4) (a) 9. of the statutes is created to read:SB784,3,1411165.85 (4) (a) 9. The board may not provide certification or recertification 12credit to a law enforcement officer for training received in a course involving 13warrior-style training. This subdivision does not prohibit the board from providing 14credit for a course consisting entirely of aikido training.SB784,615Section 6. 165.85 (5) (e) of the statutes is created to read:SB784,3,2016165.85 (5) (e) The board may not reimburse expenses under this subsection to 17a law enforcement officer, state agency, as defined in s. 66.0511 (1) (c), or political 18subdivision for a course involving warrior-style training. This paragraph does not 19prohibit the board from reimbursing expenses for a course consisting entirely of 20aikido training.SB784,3,2121